California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) Beginning in 1991, the State Department of Health Services shall include in the November estimate of Medi-Cal expenditures and the Governor’s Budget an estimate of savings from the prior year which resulted from implementation of Senate Bill 2174 of the 1987–88 Regular Session of the Legislature.

(b) Beginning in 1992, the Department of Finance shall, by February 1, deposit an amount equal to the savings level identified in the November estimate of Medi-Cal expenditures into the Critical Needs Health Care Fund, which is hereby created. Funds deposited in the Critical
 Needs Health Care Fund shall be appropriated by the Legislature for high-priority health expenditures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1348, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

14163.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Public entity” means a county, a city, a city and county, the State of California, the University of California, a local health care district, a local health authority, or any other political subdivision of the state.

(2) “Hospital” means a health facility that is licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code to provide acute inpatient hospital services, and includes all components of the facility.

(3) “Disproportionate share hospital” means a hospital providing acute inpatient services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries that meets the criteria for disproportionate share status relating to acute inpatient services set forth in Section 14105.98.

(4) “Disproportionate share list” means the annual list of disproportionate share hospitals for acute inpatient services issued by the department pursuant to Section 14105.98.

(5) “Fund” means the Medi-Cal Inpatient Payment Adjustment Fund.

(6) “Eligible hospital” means, for a particular state fiscal year, a hospital on the disproportionate share list that is eligible to receive payment adjustment amounts under Section 14105.98 with respect to that state fiscal year.

(7) “Transfer year” means the particular state fiscal year during which, or with respect to which, public entities are required by this section to make an intergovernmental transfer of funds to the Controller.

(8) “Transferor entity” means a public entity that, with respect to a particular transfer year, is required by this section to make an intergovernmental transfer of funds to the Controller.

(9) “Transfer amount” means an amount of intergovernmental transfer of funds that this section requires for a particular transferor entity
 with respect to a particular transfer year.

(10) “Intergovernmental transfer” means a transfer of funds from a public entity to the state that is local government financial participation in Medi-Cal pursuant to the terms of this section.

(11) “Licensee” means an entity that has been issued a license to operate a hospital by the department.

(12) “Annualized Medi-Cal inpatient paid days” means the total number of Medi-Cal acute inpatient hospital days, regardless of dates of service, for which payment was made by or on behalf of the department to a hospital, under present or previous ownership, during the most recent calendar year ending prior to the beginning of a particular transfer year, including all Medi-Cal acute inpatient covered days of care for hospitals that are paid on a different basis than per diem
 payments.

(13) “Medi-Cal acute inpatient hospital day” means any acute inpatient day of service attributable to patients who, for those days, were eligible for medical assistance under the California state plan, including any day of service that is reimbursed on a basis other than per diem payments.

(14) “OBRA 1993 payment limitation” means the hospital-specific limitation on the total annual amount of payment adjustments to each eligible hospital under the payment adjustment program that can be made with federal financial participation under Section 1396r-4(g) of Title 42 of the United States Code as implemented pursuant to the Medi-Cal State Plan.

(b) The Medi-Cal Inpatient Payment Adjustment Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the fund shall be
 continuously appropriated to, and under the administrative control of, the department for the purposes specified in subdivision (d). The fund shall consist of the following:

(1) Transfer amounts collected by the Controller under this section, whether submitted by transferor entities pursuant to applicable provisions of this section or obtained by offset pursuant to subdivision (j).

(2) Any other intergovernmental transfers deposited in the fund, as permitted by Section 14164 or Article 5.17 (commencing with Section 14165.55).

(3) Any interest that accrues with respect to amounts in the fund.

(c) Moneys in the fund, which shall not consist of any state general funds, shall be used as the source for the nonfederal share of payments to hospitals pursuant
 to Section 14105.98. Moneys shall be allocated from the fund by the department and matched by federal funds in accordance with customary Medi-Cal accounting procedures, and used to make payments pursuant to Section 14105.98.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in Section 14105.98 or in any law appropriating a specified sum of money to the department for administering this section and Section 14105.98, moneys in the fund shall be used only for the following:

(1) Payments to hospitals pursuant to Section 14105.98.

(2) Transfers to the Health Care Deposit Fund as follows:

(A) In the amount of two hundred thirty-nine million seven hundred fifty-seven thousand six hundred ninety dollars ($239,757,690) for the 1994–95 and 1995–96 fiscal years.

(B) In the amount of two hundred twenty-nine million seven hundred fifty-seven thousand six hundred ninety dollars ($229,757,690) for the 1996–97 fiscal year.

(C) In the amount of one hundred fifty-four million seven hundred fifty-seven thousand six hundred ninety dollars ($154,757,690) for the 1997–98 fiscal year.

(D) In the amount of one hundred fourteen million seven hundred fifty-seven thousand six hundred ninety dollars ($114,757,690) for the 1998–99 fiscal year.

(E) (i) In the amount of eighty-four million seven hundred fifty-seven thousand six hundred ninety dollars ($84,757,690) for the 1999–2000 fiscal year.

(ii) It is the intent of the Legislature that the
 economic benefit of any reduction in the amount transferred, or to be transferred, to the Health Care Deposit Fund pursuant to this subdivision for the 1999–2000 fiscal year, as compared to the amount so transferred for the 1998–99 fiscal year, be allocated equally between public and nonpublic disproportionate share hospitals. To implement the reduction in clause (i) the department shall, by June 30, 2000, adjust the calculations in Section 14105.98 in order to allocate the funds in accordance with this clause.

(F) In the amount of twenty-nine million seven hundred fifty-seven thousand six hundred ninety dollars ($29,757,690) for the 2000–01 fiscal year and the 2001–02 fiscal year.

(G) In the amount of eighty-five million dollars ($85,000,000) for the 2002–03 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter.

(H) The
 transfers from the fund shall be made in six equal monthly installments to the Medi-Cal local assistance appropriation item (Item 4260-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the annual Budget Act) in support of Medi-Cal expenditures. The first installment shall accrue in October of each transfer year, and all other installments shall accrue monthly thereafter from November through March.

(3) Transfers to the Health Care Deposit Fund for purposes set forth in Article 5.17 (commencing with Section 14165.55).

(e) For the 1991–92 state fiscal year, the department shall determine, no later than 70 days after the enactment of this section, the transferor entities for the 1991–92 transfer year. To make this determination, the department shall utilize the disproportionate share list for the 1991–92 fiscal year issued by the department pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 14105.98.
 The department shall identify each eligible hospital on the list for which a public entity is the licensee as of July 1, 1991. The public entity that is the licensee of each identified eligible hospital shall be a transferor entity for the 1991–92 transfer year.

(f) The department shall determine, no later than 70 days after the enactment of this section, the transfer amounts for the 1991–92 transfer year.

The transfer amounts shall be determined as follows:

(1) The eligible hospitals for 1991–92 shall be identified. For each hospital, the applicable total per diem payment adjustment amount under Section 14105.98 for the 1991–92 transfer year shall be computed. This amount shall be multiplied by 80 percent of the eligible hospital’s annualized Medi-Cal inpatient paid days as determined from all Medi-Cal paid claims records available
 through April 1, 1991. The products of these calculations for all eligible hospitals shall be added together to determine an aggregate sum for the 1991–92 transfer year.

(2) The eligible hospitals for 1991–92 involving transferor entities as licensees shall be identified. For each hospital, the applicable total per diem payment adjustment amount under Section 14105.98 for the 1991–92 transfer year shall be computed. This amount shall be multiplied by 80 percent of the eligible hospital’s annualized Medi-Cal inpatient paid days as determined from all Medi-Cal paid claims records available through April 1, 1991. The products of these calculations for all eligible hospitals with transferor entities as licensees shall be added together to determine an aggregate sum for the 1991–92 transfer year.

(3) The aggregate sum determined under paragraph (1) shall be divided by the aggregate sum
 determined under paragraph (2), yielding a factor to be utilized in paragraph (4).

(4) The factor determined in paragraph (3) shall be multiplied by the amount determined for each hospital under paragraph (2). The product of this calculation for each hospital in paragraph (2) shall be divided by 1.771, yielding a transfer amount for the particular transferor entity for the transfer year.

(g) For the 1991–92 transfer year, the department shall notify each transferor entity in writing of its applicable transfer amount or amounts.

(h) For the 1992–93 transfer year and subsequent transfer years, transfer amounts shall be determined in the same procedural manner as set forth in subdivision (f), except:

(1) The department shall use all of the following:

(A) The disproportionate share list applicable to the particular transfer year to determine the eligible hospitals.

(B) The payment adjustment amounts calculated under Section 14105.98 for the particular transfer year. These amounts shall take into account any projected or actual increases or decreases in the size of the payment adjustment program as are required under Section 14105.98 for the particular year in question, including any decreases resulting from the application of the OBRA 1993 payment limitation. The department may issue interim, revised, and supplemental transfer requests as necessary and appropriate to address changes in payment adjustment levels that occur under Section 14105.98. All transfer requests, or adjustments thereto, issued to transferor entities by the department shall meet the requirements set forth in subdivision (i).

(C) Data regarding annualized Medi-Cal inpatient paid days for the most recent calendar year ending prior to the beginning of the particular transfer year, as determined from all Medi-Cal paid claims records available through April 1 preceding the particular transfer year.

(D) The status of public entities as licensees of eligible hospitals as of July 1 of the particular transfer year.

(E) For the 1993–94 transfer year and subsequent transfer years, the divisor to be used for purposes of the calculation referred to in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) shall be determined by the department. The divisor shall be calculated to ensure that the appropriate amount of transfers from transferor entities are received into the fund to satisfy the requirements of Section 14105.98, exclusive of the amounts described in paragraph (2)
 of this subdivision, and to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), for the particular transfer year. For the 1993–94 transfer year, the divisor shall be 1.742.

(F) The following provisions shall apply for certain transfer amounts relating to nonsupplemental payments under Section 14105.98:

(i) For the 1998–99 transfer year, transfer amounts shall be determined as though the payment adjustment amounts arising pursuant to subdivision (ag) of Section 14105.98 were increased by the amounts paid or payable pursuant to subdivision (af) of Section 14105.98.

(ii) Any transfer amounts paid by a transferor entity pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) shall serve as credit for the particular transferor entity against an equal amount of its transfer obligation for the 1998–99 transfer year.

(iii) For the 1999–2000 transfer year, transfer amounts shall be determined as though the amount to be transferred to the Health Care Deposit Fund, as referred to in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), were reduced by 28 percent.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraphs (B), (C), and (D), for the 1993–94 transfer year and subsequent transfer years, transfer amounts shall be increased for the particular transfer year in the amounts necessary to fund the nonfederal share of the total supplemental payment adjustment amounts of all types that arise under Section 14105.98. These increases shall be paid only by those transferor entities that are licensees of hospitals that are projected to receive some or all of the particular supplemental payments, and the increases shall be paid by the transferor entities on a pro rata basis in connection with the particular
 supplemental payments. For purposes of this paragraph, supplemental payment adjustment amounts shall be deemed to arise for the particular transfer year as of the date specified in Section 14105.98. Transfer amounts to fund the nonfederal share of the payments shall be paid for the particular transfer year within 20 days after the department notifies the transferor entity in writing of the additional transfer amount to be paid.

(B) For the 1995–96 transfer year, the nonfederal share of the secondary supplemental payment adjustments described in paragraph (9) of subdivision (y) of Section 14105.98 shall be funded as follows:

(i) Ninety-nine percent of the nonfederal share shall be funded by a transfer from the University of California.

(ii) One percent of the nonfederal share shall be funded by transfers from those
 public entities that are the licensees of the hospitals included in the “other public hospitals” group referred to in clauses (ii) and (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (9) of subdivision (y) of Section 14105.98. The transfer responsibilities for this 1 percent shall be allocated to the particular public entities on a pro rata basis, based on a formula or formulae customarily used by the department for allocating transfer amounts under this section. The formula or formulae shall take into account, through reallocation of transfer amounts as appropriate, the situation of hospitals whose secondary supplemental payment adjustments are restricted due to the application of the limitation set forth in clause (v) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (9) of subdivision (y) of Section 14105.98.

(iii) All transfer amounts under this subparagraph shall be paid by the particular transferor entities within 30 days after the department notifies the
 transferor entity in writing of the transfer amount to be paid.

(C) For the 1997–98 transfer year, transfer amounts to fund the nonfederal share of the supplemental payment adjustments described in subdivision (af) of Section 14105.98 shall be funded by a transfer from the County of Los Angeles.

(D) (i) For the 1998–99 transfer year, transfer amounts to fund the nonfederal share of the supplemental payment adjustment amounts arising under subdivision (ah) of Section 14105.98 shall be increased as set forth in clause (ii).

(ii) The transfer amounts otherwise calculated to fund the supplemental payment adjustments referred to in clause (i) shall be increased on a pro rata basis by an amount equal to 28 percent of the amount to be transferred to the Health Care Deposit Fund for the 1999–2000 fiscal
 year, as referred to in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(3) The department shall prepare preliminary analyses and calculations regarding potential transfer amounts, and potential transferor entities shall be notified by the department of estimated transfer amounts as soon as reasonably feasible regarding any particular transfer year. Written notices of transfer amounts shall be issued by the department as soon as possible with respect to each transfer year. All state agencies shall take all necessary steps in order to supply applicable data to the department to accomplish these tasks. The Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development shall provide to the department quarterly access to the edited and unedited confidential patient discharge data files for all Medi-Cal eligible patients. The department shall maintain the confidentiality of that data to the same extent as is required of the Office of Statewide Health Planning and
 Development. In addition, the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development shall provide to the department, not later than March 1 of each year, the data specified by the department, as the data existed on the statewide database file as of February 1 of each year, from all of the following:

(A) Hospital annual disclosure reports, filed with the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development pursuant to former Section 443.31 of, or Section 128735 of, the Health and Safety Code, for hospital fiscal years that ended during the calendar year ending 13 months prior to the applicable February 1.

(B) Annual reports of hospitals, filed with the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development pursuant to former Section 439.2 of, or Section 127285 of, the Health and Safety Code, for the calendar year ending 13 months prior to the applicable February 1.

(C) Hospital patient discharge data reports, filed with the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development pursuant to former subdivision (g) of Section 443.31 of, or Section 128735 of, the Health and Safety Code, for the calendar year ending 13 months prior to the applicable February 1.

(D) Any other materials on file with the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(4) Transfer amounts calculated by the department may be increased or decreased by a percentage amount consistent with the Medi-Cal state plan.

(5) For the 1993–94 fiscal year, the transfer amount that would otherwise be required from the University of California shall be increased by fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000).

(6) Notwithstanding any other law, except for subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2), the total amount of transfers required from the transferor entities for any particular transfer year shall not exceed the sum of the following:

(A) The amount needed to fund the nonfederal share of all payment adjustment amounts applicable to the particular payment adjustment year as calculated under Section 14105.98. Included in the calculations for this purpose shall be any decreases in the program as a whole, and for individual hospitals, that arise due to the provisions of Section 1396r-4(f) or (g) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(B) The amount needed to fund the transfers to the Health Care Deposit Fund, as referred to in subdivision (d).

(7) (A) Except as provided in subparagraphs (B) and
 (C) and in paragraph (2) of subdivision (j), and except for a prudent reserve not to exceed two million dollars ($2,000,000) in the Medi-Cal Inpatient Payment Adjustment Fund, any amounts in the fund, including interest that accrues with respect to the amounts in the fund, that are not expended, or estimated to be required for expenditure, under Section 14105.98 with respect to a particular transfer year shall be returned on a pro rata basis to the transferor entities for the particular transfer year within 120 days after the department determines that the funds are not needed for an expenditure in connection with the particular transfer year.

(B) The department shall determine the interest amounts that have accrued in the fund from its inception through June 30, 1995, and, no later than January 1, 1996, shall distribute these interest amounts to transferor entities:

(C) With
 respect to those particular amounts in the fund resulting solely from the provisions of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2), the department shall determine by September 30, 1999, whether these particular amounts exceed 28 percent of the amount to be transferred to the Health Care Deposit Fund for the 1999–2000 fiscal year, as referred to in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d). Any excess amount so determined shall be returned to the particular transferor entities on a pro rata basis no later than October 31, 1999.

(D) Regarding any funds returned to a transferor entity under subparagraph (A) or (C), or interest amounts distributed to a transferor entity under subparagraph (B), the department shall provide to the transferor entity a written statement that explains the basis for the particular return or distribution of funds and contains the general calculations used by the department in determining the amount of the particular return or distribution
 of funds.

(i) (1) For the 1991–92 transfer year, each transferor entity shall pay its transfer amount or amounts to the Controller, for deposit in the fund, in eight equal installments.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraphs (B) and (C), for the 1992–93 transfer year and subsequent transfer years, each transferor entity shall pay its transfer amount or amounts to the Controller, for deposit in the fund, in eight equal installments. However, for the 1997–98 and subsequent transfer years, each transferor entity shall pay its transfer amount or amounts to the Controller, for deposit in the fund, in the form of periodic installments according to a timetable established by the department. The timetable shall be structured to effectuate, on a reasonable basis, the prompt distribution of all nonsupplemental payment adjustments under
 Section 14105.98, and transfers to the Health Care Deposit Fund under subdivision (d).

(B) For the 1994–95 transfer year, each transferor entity shall pay its transfer amount or amounts to the Controller, for deposit in the fund, in five equal installments.

(C) For the 1995–96 transfer year, each transferor entity shall pay its transfer amount or amounts to the Controller, for deposit in the fund, in five equal installments.

(D) Except as otherwise specifically provided, subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, shall not apply to increases in transfer amounts described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) or to additional transfer amounts described in subdivision (o).

(E) All requests for transfer payments, or adjustments thereto, issued by the department
 shall be in writing and shall include (i) an explanation of the basis for the particular transfer request or transfer activity, (ii) a summary description of program funding status for the particular transfer year, and (iii) the general calculations used by the department in connection with the particular transfer request or transfer activity.

(3) A transferor entity may use any of the following funds for purposes of meeting its transfer obligations under this section:

(A) General funds of the transferor entity.

(B) Any other funds permitted by law to be used for these purposes, except that a transferor entity shall not submit to the Controller any federal funds unless those federal funds are authorized by federal law to be used to match other federal funds. In addition, no private donated funds from any health care
 provider, or from any person or organization affiliated with the health care provider, shall be channeled through a transferor entity or any other public entity to the fund, unless the donated funds will qualify under federal rules as a valid component of the nonfederal share of the Medi-Cal program and will be matched by federal funds. The transferor entity shall be responsible for determining that funds transferred meet the requirements of this subparagraph.

(j) (1) If a transferor entity does not submit any transfer amount within the time period specified in this section, the Controller shall offset immediately the amount owed against any funds which otherwise would be payable by the state to the transferor entity. The Controller, however, shall not impose an offset against any particular funds payable to the transferor entity where the offset would violate state or federal law.

(2) Where a withhold or a recoupment occurs pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (2) of subdivision (r) of Section 14105.98, the nonfederal portion of the amount in question shall remain in the fund, or shall be redeposited in the fund by the department, as applicable. The department shall then proceed as follows:

(A) If the withhold or recoupment was imposed with respect to a hospital whose licensee was a transferor entity for the particular state fiscal year to which the withhold or recoupment related, the nonfederal portion of the amount withheld or recouped shall serve as a credit for the particular transferor entity against an equal amount of transfer obligations under this section, to be applied whenever the transfer obligations next arise. Should no such transfer obligation arise within 180 days, the department shall return the funds in question to the particular transferor
 entity within 30 days thereafter.

(B) For other situations, the withheld or recouped nonfederal portion shall be subject to paragraph (7) of subdivision (h).

(k) All transfer amounts received by the Controller or amounts offset by the Controller shall immediately be deposited in the fund.

(l) For purposes of this section, the disproportionate share list utilized by the department for a particular transfer year shall be identical to the disproportionate share list utilized by the department for the same state fiscal year for purposes of Section 14105.98. Nothing on a disproportionate share list, once issued by the department, shall be modified for any reason other than mathematical or typographical errors or omissions on the part of the department or the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development in
 preparation of the list.

(m) Neither the intergovernmental transfers required by this section, nor any elective transfer made pursuant to Section 14164 or Article 5.17 (commencing with Section 14165.55), shall create, lead to, or expand the health care funding or service obligations for current or future years for any transferor entity, except as required of the state by this section or as may be required by federal law, in which case the state shall be held harmless by the transferor entities on a pro rata basis.

(n) Except as otherwise permitted by state and federal law, no transfer amount submitted to the Controller under this section, and no offset by the Controller pursuant to subdivision (j), shall be claimed or recognized as an allowable element of cost in Medi-Cal cost reports submitted to the department.

(o) Whenever additional transfer amounts are required to fund the nonfederal share of payment adjustment amounts under Section 14105.98 that are distributed after the close of the particular payment adjustment year to which the payment adjustment amounts apply, the additional transfer amounts shall be paid by the parties who were the transferor entities for the particular transfer year that was concurrent with the particular payment adjustment year. The additional transfer amounts shall be calculated under the formula that was in effect during the particular transfer year. For transfer years prior to the 1993–94 transfer year, the percentage of the additional transfer amounts available for transfer to the Health Care Deposit Fund under subdivision (d) shall be the percentage that was in effect during the particular transfer year. These additional transfer amounts shall be paid by transferor entities within 20 days after the department notifies the transferor entity in writing of the additional
 transfer amount to be paid.

(p) (1) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) of the amount transferred from the Medi-Cal Inpatient Payment Adjustment Fund to the Health Care Deposit Fund due to amounts transferred attributable to years prior to the 1993–94 fiscal year is hereby appropriated without regard to fiscal years to the State Department of Health Care Services to be used to support the development of managed care programs under the department’s plan to expand Medi-Cal managed care.

(2) These funds shall be used by the department for both of the following purposes: (A) distributions to counties or other local entities that contract with the department to receive those funds to offset a portion of the costs of forming the local initiative entity and (B) distributions to local initiative entities that contract with the department to receive those funds to
 offset a portion of the costs of developing the local initiative health delivery system in accordance with the department’s plan to expand Medi-Cal managed care.

(3) Entities contracting with the department for any portion of the ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall meet the objectives of the department’s plan to expand Medi-Cal managed care with regard to traditional and safety net providers.

(4) Entities contracting with the department for any portion of the ten million dollars ($10,000,000) may be authorized under those contracts to utilize their funds to provide for reimbursement of the costs of local organizations and entities incurred in participating in the development and operation of a local initiative.

(5) To the full extent permitted by state and federal law, these funds shall be distributed by the
 department for expenditure at the local level in a manner that qualifies for federal financial participation under the Medicaid Program.

(q) (1) Any local initiative entity that has performed unanticipated additional work for the purposes identified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (p) resulting in additional costs attributable to the development of its local initiative health delivery system, may file a claim for reimbursement with the department for the additional costs incurred due to delays in start dates through the 1996–97 fiscal year. The claim shall be filed by the local initiative entity not later than 90 days after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision, and shall not seek extra compensation for any sum that is or could have been asserted pursuant to the contract disputes and appeals resolution provisions of the local initiative entity’s respective two-plan model contract. All
 claims for unanticipated additional incurred costs shall be submitted with adequate supporting documentation including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Invoices, receipts, job descriptions, payroll records, work plans, and other materials that identify the unanticipated additional claimed and incurred costs.

(B) Documents reflecting mitigation of costs.

(C) To the extent lost profits are included in the claim, documentation identifying those profits and the manner of calculation.

(D) Documents reflecting the anticipated start date, the actual start date, and reasons for the delay between the dates, if any.

(2) In determining any amount to be paid, the department shall do all
 of the following:

(A) Conduct a fiscal analysis of the local initiative entity’s claimed costs.

(B) Determine the appropriate amount of payment, after taking into consideration the supporting documentation and the results of any audit.

(C) Provide funding for any such payment, as approved by the Department of Finance through the deficiency process.

(D) Complete the determination required in subparagraph (B) within six months after receipt of a local initiative entity’s completed claim and supporting documentation. Prior to final determination, there shall be a review and comment period for that local initiative entity.

(E) Make reasonable efforts to obtain federal financial participation.
 In the event federal financial participation is not allowed for this payment, the state’s payment shall be 50 percent of the total amount determined to be payable.

(r) Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use the moneys in the Medi-Cal Inpatient Payment Adjustment Fund for loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. However, interest shall be paid on all moneys loaned to the General Fund from the Medi-Cal Inpatient Payment Adjustment Fund. Interest payable shall be computed at a rate determined by the Pooled Money Investment Board to be the current earning rate of the fund from which loaned. This subdivision does not authorize any transfer that will interfere with the carrying out of the object for which the Medi-Cal Inpatient Payment Adjustment Fund was created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 20, Sec. 1.   (AB 113)   Effective April 13, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14164.

(a) In addition to the required intergovernmental transfers set forth in Section 14163, any county, other political subdivision of the state, or governmental entity in the state may elect to transfer funds, subject to subdivision (m) of Section 14163, to the department in support of the Medi-Cal program. Those transfers may consist of cash or loans to the state. The department shall have the discretion to accept or not accept any elective transfer from a county, political subdivision, or other governmental entity, as well as the discretion of whether to deposit the transfer in the Medi-Cal Inpatient Payment Adjustment Fund established pursuant to Section 14163. If the department accepts a transfer pursuant to this section, the department shall
 obtain federal matching funds to the full extent permitted by federal law.

(b) (1) The director may maximize available federal financial participation to provide access to services provided by hospitals that are not reimbursed by certified public expenditure pursuant to Article 5.2 (commencing with Section 14166) by authorizing the use of intergovernmental transfers to fund the nonfederal share of supplemental payments as permitted under Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations or any other applicable federal Medicaid laws. The transferring entity shall certify to the department that the funds are in compliance with all federal rules and regulations. Any payments funded by intergovernmental transfers shall remain with the hospital and shall not be transferred back to any county, other political subdivision of the state, or governmental entity in the state, except for federal disallowance or withhold
 recovery efforts by the department. Participation in intergovernmental transfers under this subdivision is voluntary on the part of the transferring entity for purposes of all applicable federal laws.

(2) This subdivision shall be implemented only to the extent federal financial participation is not jeopardized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   (SB 239)   Effective October 8, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.1. California Medical Assistance Commission [14165. - 14165.11.]

14165.

(a) There is hereby created in the Governor’s office the California Medical Assistance Commission, for the purpose of contracting with health care delivery systems for the provision of health care services to recipients under the California Medical Assistance program.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission created pursuant to subdivision (a) shall continue through June 30, 2012, after which, it shall be dissolved and the term of any commissioner serving at that time shall end.

(1) Upon dissolution of the commission, all powers, duties, and responsibilities of the commission shall be transferred to the Director of Health Care Services.
 These powers, duties, and responsibilities shall include, but are not limited to, those exercised in the operation of the selective provider contracting program pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081).

(2) (A) On July 1, 2012, notwithstanding any other law, employees of the California Medical Assistance Commission as of June 30, 2012, excluding commissioners, shall transfer to the State Department of Health Care Services.

(B) Employees who transfer pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be subject to the same conditions of employment under the department as they were under the California Medical Assistance Commission, including retention of their exempt status, until the diagnosis-related groups payment system described in Section 14105.28 replaces the contract-based payment system described in this article.

(C) (i) Notwithstanding any other law or rule, persons employed by the department who transferred to the department pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be eligible to apply for civil service examinations. Persons receiving passing scores shall have their names placed on lists resulting from these examinations, or otherwise gain eligibility for appointment. In evaluating minimum qualifications, related California Medical Assistance Commission experience shall be considered state civil service experience in a class deemed comparable by the State Personnel Board, based on the duties and responsibilities assigned.

(ii) On the date the diagnosis-related groups payment system described in Section 14105.28 replaces the contract-based system described in this article, employees who transferred to the department pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall transfer to civil service
 classifications within the department for which they are eligible.

(3) Upon a determination by the Director of Health Care Services that a payment system based on diagnosis-related groups as described in Section 14105.28 that is sufficient to replace the contract-based payment system described in this article has been developed and implemented, the powers, duties, and responsibilities conferred on the commission and transferred to the Director of Health Care Services shall no longer be exercised, excluding all of the following:

(A) Stabilization payments made or committed from Sections 14166.14 and 14166.19 for services rendered prior to the director’s determination pursuant to this paragraph.

(B) The ability to negotiate and make payments from the Private Hospital Supplemental Fund, established pursuant to Section
 14166.12, and the Nondesignated Public Hospital Supplemental Fund, established pursuant to Section 14166.17.

(C) The ability to continue to administer and distribute payments for the Construction and Renovation Reimbursement Program, in accordance with Sections 14085 to 14085.57, inclusive. Notwithstanding any other law, maintaining or negotiating a selective provider contract pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081) or a contract with a county organized health system shall cease to be a requirement for a hospital’s participation in the Construction and Renovation Reimbursement Program.
